suffixes/Verbal_Transducer/regras.xfst
!Copyright (C) 2019 Hélio L. B. Silva
!Distributed under the terms of the GNU General Public License Version 3

define MB "^" ;
regex [ r -> 0 || a _ MB ];
regex [ a -> 0 || z _ MB ];
define DeleteMB [ MB -> 0 ];
regex DeleteMB;
turn stack
compose net
